Alabama, session 2026rs, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
58 Section 1. Section 16-40A-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
59 amended to read as follows:
60 "§16-40A-2
61 (a) Any program or curriculum in the public schools in
62 Alabama that includes sex education or the human reproductive
63 process shall teach sexual risk avoidance content and, at a
64 minimum, include and emphasize each of the following:
65 (1) Abstinence from sex all sexual activity is the only
66 completely100 percent effective protection against way to
67 prevent unintended pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases
68 and infections, and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) when
69 transmitted sexually.
70 (2) Abstinence from sex all sexual activity outside of
71 marriage is the expected social standard best health practice
72 for unmarried school-age persons individuals.
73 (3) The advantages of avoiding nonmarital sexual
74 activity and the potential physical and emotional negative
75 outcomes associated with youth and teen sexual activity.
76 (b) For the purposes of this section, "sexual risk
77 avoidance" refers to a primary prevention approach to sex
78 education that seeks to achieve the most favorable health
79 outcomes for all Alabama youth by providing information and
80 skills needed to achieve the benefits of avoiding sexual
81 activity.
82 (c) Course materials and instruction that relate to
83 sexual health education or sexually transmitted diseases and
84 infections shall be age-appropriate and medically accurate.
Page 3

infections shall be age-appropriate and medically accurate.
SB3 INTRODUCED
85 For purposes of this section, the term "age-appropriate" means
86 topics, messages, and teaching methods suitable to particular
87 ages or age groups of children and adolescents, based on
88 developing cognitive, emotional, and behavioral capacity
89 typical for the age or age group.
90 (c)(d) Course materials and instruction that relate to
91 sexual health education or sexually transmitted diseases and
92 infections, if available, shall include all of the following
93 elements:
94 (1) An emphasis on sexual abstinence as the only
95 completely reliable method of avoiding unintended teenage
96 pregnancy and sexually transmitted diseases and infections.
97 (2) The emphasis shall be on the importance of delaying
98 sexual activity by and discouraging risky sexual behavior,
99 providing skills to avoid sexual risk, and developing
100 awareness among students of how sexual activity can impact the
101 whole person, including physical, social, emotional,
102 psychological, economic, and educational life outcomes.
103 (3) Statistics and data based on the latest accurate
104 medical information that indicate the degree of reliability
105 and unreliability real life usage regarding the efficacy and
106 limitations of various forms of contraception among the youth
107 population, while also emphasizing the increase in protection
108 against pregnancy and protection against sexually transmitted
109 infections, including HIV infection, which is afforded by the
110 use of various contraceptive measures; provided, that the
111 content: (i) is aligned with the exclusive message of sexual
112 risk avoidance; (ii) does not encourage or promote sexual
Page 4

risk avoidance; (ii) does not encourage or promote sexual
SB3 INTRODUCED
113 behavior among youth and teens; and (iii) is presented in the
114 context that while contraception may reduce the risk of
115 pregnancy and contracting sexually transmitted infections,
116 including HIV, it does not eliminate the risk.
117 (4) Information Accurate and current information
118 concerning the laws relating to all of the following:
119 a. Thethe financial responsibilities impact associated
120 with pregnancy, childbirth, and child rearing.
121 b. Abortion, including medically accurate information
122 regarding the procedure and risks associated with the
123 procedure, and abortion law in Alabama.
124 c. The process of domestic infant adoption, including
125 the availability of relevant resources.
126 d. The process for surrendering a newborn infant
127 pursuant to Chapter 25 of Title 26.
128 (5) Information concerning the laws prohibiting sexual
129 abuse, the need to report such abuse to a parent, guardian, or
130 law enforcement, and the legal options available to victims of
131 sexual abuse.
132 (6) Information on how to identify and avoid unhealthy
133 relationships, including factors predictive of physical,
134 emotional, or sexual abuse and exploitation, coercion, or
135 assault, and how to cope with and rebuff unwanted physical and
136 verbal sexual exploitation by other persons individuals.
137 (7) Psychologically sound methods of resisting
138 Knowledge and skills to resist unwanted peer pressure and
139 avoid cyberbullying, sexting, pornography, and online sexual
140 predators, and the potential legal implications of
Page 5

predators, and the potential legal implications of
SB3 INTRODUCED
141 participating in any of the preceding activities.
142 (8) Comprehensive instruction in all of the following:
143 a. Parentingparenting skills and responsibilities,
144 including the benefits of a child being raised by both
145 parents, responsibility to pay child support by non-custodial
146 a noncustodial parent or parents, the penalties for
147 non-payment nonpayment of child support, and the legal and
148 ethical responsibilities of child care and child rearing.
149 b. The impact of youth and teenage pregnancy on the
150 parent, child, and society.
151 c. The benefits of raising children within the context
152 of marriage.
153 d. The options for individuals experiencing unintended
154 pregnancy, the benefits of adoption for both the pregnant
155 youth or teenager and the child, and the associated challenges
156 of parenting, abortion, and adoption decisions.
157 e. Medically sound information relating to fetal growth
158 and development, maternal health, and infant health.
159 f. The educational and financial impact of youth and
160 teenage pregnancies.
161 (d)(e) Parents or guardians shall be given advanced,
162 written notification of the teaching of any sex education or
163 of the human reproductive process at least 14 days before the
164 content is taught to students. Upon the request of a parent or
165 guardian and prior to distribution to students, the school
166 shall make available to parents or guardians the sex education
167 curriculum in its entirety and provide each parent or guardian
168 with the opportunity to opt his or her child out from the
Page 6

with the opportunity to opt his or her child out from the
SB3 INTRODUCED
169 instruction, with no penalty to the student.
170 (f) Sex education and human reproductive curricula,
171 advice, or content offered by a public K-12 school may not
172 include any of the following:
173 (1) Information that misrepresents the efficacy of
174 contraception use or demonstrates the use of contraceptive
175 materials.
176 (2) Information on how to obtain, or that provides a
177 referral to, abortion services.
178 (3) Images, materials, or video footage that are
179 sexually explicit.
180 (g) Local boards of education may not use the services
181 of any individual or organization to assist in teaching about
182 sex education or the human reproductive process if that
183 individual or organization does not endorse sexual risk
184 avoidance as the primary means of sex education, or if the
185 individual or organization performs abortions, provides
186 referrals to abortion services, or provides funding, advocacy,
187 or other support for abortions.
188 (h) The Attorney General shall have the authority to
189 enforce this section by obtaining injunctive relief to require
190 compliance with this section."
191 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
192 1, 2026.
Page 7